Hawaii statutes.
§352-29 Termination of director's right to
supervise person. (a) The authority of the director to supervise the
conduct of a person who has been committed to the director's care, unless such
authority shall be sooner terminated pursuant to this chapter or chapter 571,
shall cease:

(1) At the time of sentencing for any subsequent
offense for which the committed person has been waived pursuant to section 571-22
and has been convicted by a court of competent criminal jurisdiction;

(2) At the expiration date of the order of commitment
issued unless the director has, prior to such expiration date, sought and
obtained from the court an extension of such order;

(3) Whenever the director, prior to the termination
otherwise of such order, determines that the purposes of such order have been
achieved in the case of a person under age eighteen; provided that if the
commitment order reserves the prior approval of the family court for any
discharge before termination, the director shall obtain approval of the court
for a discharge; or

(4) Whenever the director, prior to the termination
otherwise of such order, determines that the purposes of such order have been
achieved in the case of a person committed to a term extending beyond the
person's eighteenth birthday and obtains court approval prior to discharge.

(b) The director, in each case described in
subsection (a)(2), (3) and (4) of this section, shall immediately notify the
person, the court, the police department of the county where the committed
person resided before commitment, and, if a minor, the person's parent or
guardian of the termination of the director's supervision over such person,
provided that in cases covered by subsection (a)(1), the sentencing court shall
provide such notification including notice to the director. [L 1980, c 303, pt
of §8(1); am L 1981, c 134, §1; am L 1997, c 325, §4]

Revision Note

In subsection (a)(1) and (2), "or" deleted pursuant
to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next